Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202285-2902
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Veteran Promise Act:

(1) Eligible military student means a student who:

(a) Graduated from a Nebraska high school on or after January 1, 2022;

(b) Signed enlistment papers to serve in a uniformed service; and

(c)(i) At the time of application is serving in such uniformed service under a six-year obligation; or

(ii) Has served at least two years of active duty in such uniformed service and at the time of application is serving in such uniformed service or another uniformed service;

(2) Eligible veteran student means a student who:

(a)(i) Graduated from a Nebraska high school on or after January 1, 2002; or

(ii) Graduated from a high school in another state on or after January 1, 2002, and served in a uniformed service while assigned to a location in this state;

(b) Signed enlistment papers to serve in a uniformed service; and

(c) Received either an honorable discharge or a general discharge under honorable conditions from a uniformed service; and

(3) Uniformed service means an active or reserve component of:

(a) The Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, Merchant Marine, or Space Force of the United States;

(b) The Commissioned Officer Corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration or of the Public Health Service of the United States; or

(c) The Nebraska National Guard.

Laws 2021, LB669, § 2.